midterm/test2.lexc
Multichar_Symbols %<perf%>

%<o_sg1%> %<o_sg2%> %<o_sg3%>
%<o_pl1%> %<o_pl2%> %<o_pl3%>

%<s_sg1%> %<s_sg2%> %<s_sg3%>
%<s_pl1%> %<s_pl2%> %<s_pl3%>

%<v%> %<tv%>

%>

LEXICON root
object ;

LEXICON object
xi:xi%<o_sg1%>%> subject ;
xin:xin%<o_sg1%>%> subject ;
xat:xat%<o_sg2%>%> subject ;
x:x%<o_sg3%>%> subject ;
xoj:xoj%<o_pl1%>%> subject ;
xix:xix%<o_pl2%>%> subject ;
xe:xe%<o_pl3%>%> subject ;

LEXICON subject
nu:nu%<s_sg1%>%> stem ; 
a:a%<s_sg2%>%> stem ;
ru:ru%<s_sg3%>%> stem ;
u:u%<s_sg3%>%> stem ;
tu:tu%<s_sg3%>%> stem ;
qa:qa%<s_pl1%>%> stem ;
ni:ni%<s_pl2%>%> stem ;
i:i%<s_pl2%>%> stem ; 
'i:'i%<s_pl2%>%> stem ;
ki:ki%<s_pl3%>%> stem ;

LEXICON stem
tz'ät:tz'ät # ;
